Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 20 Tax on Railroads [Repealed]

§§ 39-20-101 through 39-20-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 5, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This chapter, which derived from
Laws 2000, ch. 31, § 1, provided for a tax on railroads.

Laws 2004, ch. 5, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2004.